Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
During the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  all lottery revenues available to
benefit the public purposes specified in Article XV,  section 4, of the Oregon Constitution,
that are in excess of distributions or allocations required by law shall be maintained  in the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund.
SECTION 2. All moneys  in the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund as
of July 1, 2017,  and thereafter are reserved to meet the commitments of sections 1 to 12 of
this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2017,
from the Administrative Services Economic  Development Fund, to the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 7,094,443
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 56,363,565
(3) Oregon Infrastructure
Finance Authority ..................... $ 1,548,664
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,207,545
SECTION 4. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the Department of Education, for  the
State School Fund, the amount of $464,758,594.
SECTION 5. There is transferred to the  Lottery Bond Fund for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the Oregon Education Fund, 100 percent  of the declared earnings on the
Education Stability Fund that are transferred to  the Oregon Education Fund during the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, to be used by the Department of Education for  the purposes
of maintaining cash flow  and paying, when due, the principal, interest and premium, if any,
on outstanding education lottery bonds.
SECTION 6. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the office of  the Governor, the amount
of $3,689,100 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 7. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  establish a
process for allocating available moneys in the Administrative Services Economic  Develop-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 1
ment Fund on a quarterly basis to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 1 to 12 of
this 2017 Act. The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys  transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development Fund are insufficient to  pay for the quarterly
allocations made by sections 1 to 12 of this  2017 Act or any other 2017 Act, prior to making
any other allocations pursuant to sections 1 to 12 of this  2017 Act, the department shall
satisfy lottery bond debt service obligations in the amount of $247,787,311 for  outstanding
lottery bonds.
(3) After the lottery bond debt  service obligations described in subsection (2) of this
section are satisfied, if the remaining moneys transferred from  the State Lottery Fund to
the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund are insufficient to pay  for the
quarterly allocations made by sections 1 to 12 of this  2017 Act, the department shall reduce
the quarterly allocations  not described in subsection (2) of this section proportionately in
amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 8.
There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, the amount of $247,787,311 for the purpose of paying, when due, the  principal, in-
terest and premium, if any, on outstanding lottery bonds, as described  in section 7 of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.547 (1) for a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the amount
allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services for distribution to counties for economic  development
activities as provided by ORS 461.547 is $41,285,992.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for  a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the amount
allocated from the Administrative  Services Economic Development Fund to the Problem
Gambling Treatment Fund is $12,457,116.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in  ORS 565.447 for a
percentage-based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  the amount
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to  the County Fair
Account established in ORS 565.445 is $3,828,000.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the allocation described in section 2  (3),
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2017 (Ballot Measure 99 (2016)), for a  percentage-based transfer of
moneys with an annual cap,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the amount allocated
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to  the Outdoor School Edu-
cation Fund is $24,000,000.
SECTION 12a. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in  ORS 461.543 (4) for a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the amount
allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Sports Lot-
tery Account is $8,240,000.
SECTION 13. There are allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to  the Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lot-
tery Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 7,833,718
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ..................................... $ 6,904,151
(3) National Service
Organizations............................ $ 118,156
SECTION 14. There is allocated for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the  Veterans’ Housing and Community Services Department
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 2
Dedicated Lottery Fund,  the amount of $1,500,000 for the provision of housing assistance to
veterans.
SECTION 15. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  shall establish a
process for allocating  available moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund on a quarterly basis
to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 13 and 14 of this 2017 Act.
(2) If the moneys transferred from the  State Lottery Fund to the Veterans’ Services
Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations  under subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall reduce the quarterly allocations proportionately  in amounts sufficient
to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding ORS 137.300, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the
Department of Revenue shall distribute the moneys in  the Criminal Fine Account established
by ORS 137.300 as specified in sections 17 to 21 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17. There are allocated to the Department of Public Safety  Standards and
Training for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Criminal Fine Account, the fol-
lowing amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Criminal justice training
and standards operations .......... $ 32,584,757
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ... $ 200,030
SECTION 18.
There are allocated  to the Department of Justice for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2017, from the Criminal Fine Account, the following  amounts for the following
purposes:
(1) Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Intervention Account ................ $ 10,679,854
(2) Creation and operation of a
statewide system of regional
assessment centers as
provided under ORS 418.746
to 418.796................................... $ 815,961
(3) Criminal Injuries
Compensation Account ............. $ 9,095,393
(4) Services to children eligible
for compensation under
ORS 147.390 and costs to
administer provision of
these services ........................... $ 690,667
SECTION 19.
There are allocated to the Department of Human Services for  the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, from the Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for  the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Domestic Violence Fund
established for ORS 409.300
for the purpose of
ORS 409.292 (1)(a) to (c) ............ $ 2,239,608
(2) Sexual Assault Victims Fund .... $ 518,399
SECTION 20.
There are allocated to the State Court Facilities  and Security Account es-
tablished under ORS 1.178, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, from the Criminal Fine
Account, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) State court security
and emergency preparedness .... $ 3,588,745
(2) Distributions to county court
facilities security accounts ....... $ 2,824,208
SECTION 21. (1) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium be-
ginning July 1,  2017, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $42,884 for the purpose
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 3
of grants under ORS 430.345 for the establishment, operation  and maintenance of alcohol and
drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services provided through  a county.
(2) There is allocated to the  Law Enforcement Medical Liability Account established un-
der ORS 414.815, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Criminal Fine  Account,
the amount of $1,354,360.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon State Police  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $351,572 for the purpose of enforcing the laws
relating to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(4) There is allocated to the Department of  Corrections for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $4,257,421 for  the purpose of plan-
ning, operating and maintaining county juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities
and drug and alcohol programs.  The grant to each county shall be based on amounts depos-
ited in the Criminal Fine and Assessment Account  by the circuit court for the county in the
2009-2011 biennium.
(5) There is allocated to the State  Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the  Criminal Fine Account, the amount of
$3,110,000.
(6) There is allocated to  the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund created under ORS 813.270,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of
$4,323,000.
(7) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium  beginning July
1, 2017, from the Criminal Fine Account, the  amount of $331,824 for the Emergency Medical
Services and Trauma Systems Program created under ORS 431A.085.
SECTION 22.
After distributing  the amounts specified in sections 17 to 21 of this 2017
Act, the Department of Revenue shall distribute funds remaining in the  Criminal Fine Ac-
count to the General Fund.
SECTION 23. (1) There is allocated to the State School Fund  established under ORS
327.008, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Oregon  Marijuana Account, the
amount of $80,987,200.
(2) There  is allocated to the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account es-
tablished under ORS 430.380, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from  the Oregon
Marijuana Account, the amount of $40,493,600.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon Health  Authority, for the health systems division,
for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount
of $10,123,400 for purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early  intervention
and treatment services.
(4) There is allocated to  the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for the
biennium beginning July  1, 2017, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of
$30,370,200.
SECTION 24. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 4
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 5